Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-815
Actions; parties; defense; retention of funds.

In such actions all persons whose liens are filed as herein provided and other encumbrancers may be made parties and the issues shall be made and the trials shall be conducted as in other civil cases. Where such action is brought by any person other than an original contractor, the original contractor through whom such person claims a lien shall be made a party defendant and shall at his own expense defend against the claim and if the contractor fails to make such defense, the owner may make the same at the expense of such original contractor. Until all claims, costs, and expenses are finally adjudicated and defeated or satisfied, the owner shall be entitled to retain from the original contractor the amount thereof.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 15, p. 814.